California, session 20252026, AB2054.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3302.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code is amended to read:3302.1. (a)For the purposes of this chapter:(1)(a) “Covered active duty” means, with respect to a member of the regular Armed Forces of the United States, duty during the deployment or training of the member with the regular armed forces to a foreign country and, with respect to a member of the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, duty during the deployment of the member of those reserve components to a foreign country under a federal call or order to including the National Guard, duty during training or a call or order to federal or state active duty.(2)(b) “Disability benefit period” with respect to any individual, means the period of unemployment beginning with the first day an individual establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits to care for a seriously ill family member, to bond with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.(A)(1) Periods of family care leave for the same care recipient within a 12-month period shall be considered one disability benefit period.(B)(2) Periods of disability for pregnancy, as defined in Section 2608, and periods of family care leave for bonding associated with the birth of that child shall be considered one disability benefit period.(b)This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________